pam.twol
Alphabet

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
%{C%}:g %{C%}:k %{C%}:l %{C%}:m %{C%}:p %{C%}:s %{C%}:t
%{V%}:a %{V%}:e %{V%}:i %{V%}:o %{V%}:u
%>
;
Sets

Vowel = a e i o u ;
Consonants = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ; 

Rules

"reduplication consonants"
%{C%}:Cy <=> _ :Vowel %>: Cy ;
	where Cy in ( g k l m p s t );

"reduplication vowels"
%{V%}:Vy <=> %{C%}: _ %>:  Consonants: Vy ;
	where Vy in ( a e i o u  );
